Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1217.
do enact as follows:AB1217,11Section 1. 40.51 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1217,2,6240.51 (8) Every health care coverage plan offered by the state under sub. (6) 3shall comply with ss. 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 631.95, 632.72 (2), 632.722, 4632.729, 632.746 (1) to (8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.798, 632.83, 632.835, 5632.848, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (3) to (6), 632.885, 6632.89, 632.895 (5m) and (8) to (17), and 632.896.AB1217,27Section 2. 40.51 (8m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1217,3,2840.51 (8m) Every health care coverage plan offered by the group insurance 9board under sub. (7) shall comply with ss. 631.95, 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (1) to 1(8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.798, 632.83, 632.835, 632.848, 632.85, 632.853, 2632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.885, 632.89, and 632.895 (11) to (17).AB1217,33Section 3. 66.0137 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1217,3,10466.0137 (4) Self-insured health plans. If a city, including a 1st class city, 5or a village provides health care benefits under its home rule power, or if a town 6provides health care benefits, to its officers and employees on a self-insured basis, 7the self-insured plan shall comply with ss. 49.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 8632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and (b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.798, 632.848, 9632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 10632.895 (9) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).AB1217,411Section 4. 120.13 (2) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1217,3,1512120.13 (2) (g) Every self-insured plan under par. (b) shall comply with ss. 1349.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and 14(b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.798, 632.848, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 15632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (9) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).AB1217,516Section 5. 185.983 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1217,3,2417185.983 (1) (intro.) Every voluntary nonprofit health care plan operated by a 18cooperative association organized under s. 185.981 shall be exempt from chs. 600 to 19646, with the exception of ss. 601.04, 601.13, 601.31, 601.41, 601.42, 601.43, 601.44, 20601.45, 611.26, 611.67, 619.04, 623.11, 623.12, 628.34 (10), 631.17, 631.89, 631.93, 21631.95, 632.72 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.745 to 632.749, 632.775, 632.79, 632.795, 22632.798, 632.848, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (2) to (6), 23632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (5) and (8) to (17), 632.896, and 632.897 (10) and chs. 609, 24620, 630, 635, 645, and 646, but the sponsoring association shall:AB1217,61Section 6. 609.815 of the statutes is created to read:AB1217,4,42609.815 Exemption from prior authorization requirements. Limited 3service health organizations, preferred provider plans, and defined network plans 4are subject to any rules promulgated by the commissioner under s. 632.848.AB1217,75Section 7. 628.42 of the statutes is created to read:AB1217,4,76628.42 Disclosure and review of prior authorization requirements. 7(1) In this section:AB1217,4,88(a) “Health care plan” has the meaning given in s. 628.36 (2) (a) 1.AB1217,4,119(b) 1. “Prior authorization” means the process by which a health care plan or 10a contracted utilization review organization determines the medical necessity and 11medical appropriateness of otherwise covered health care services.AB1217,4,14122. “Prior authorization” includes any requirement that an enrollee or provider 13notify the health care plan or a contracted utilization review organization before, at 14the time of, or concurrent to providing a health care service.AB1217,4,1515(b) “Provider” has the meaning given in s. 628.36 (2) (a) 2.AB1217,4,1816(2) (a) A health care plan shall maintain a complete list of services for which 17prior authorization is required, including services where prior authorization is 18performed by an entity under contract with the health care plan.AB1217,4,2119(b) A health care plan shall publish the list under par. (a) on its website. The 20list shall be accessible by members of the general public without requiring the 21creation of an account or the entry of any credentials or personal information.AB1217,4,2322(c) The list under par. (a) is not required to contain any clinical review criteria 23applicable to the services.AB1217,5,724(3) (a) A health care plan shall make any current prior authorization 1requirements and restrictions along with the clinical review criteria applicable to 2those requirements or restrictions accessible and conspicuously posted on its 3website to enrollees and providers. Content published by a 3rd party and licensed 4for use by a health care plan or a contracted utilization review organization may 5satisfy this subsection if it is available to access through the website of the health 6care plan or the contracted utilization review organization as long as the website 7does not unreasonably restrict access.AB1217,5,108(b) The prior authorization requirements and restrictions under par. (a) shall 9be described in detail and shall be written in easily understandable, plain 10language.AB1217,5,1311(c) The prior authorization requirements and restrictions under par. (a) shall 12indicate all of the following for each service subject to a prior authorization 13requirement or restriction:AB1217,5,15141. When the requirement or restriction began for policies issued or delivered 15in this state, including effective dates and any termination dates.AB1217,5,17162. The date that the requirement or restriction was listed on the website of the 17health care plan or a contracted utilization review organization.AB1217,5,18183. The date that the requirement or restriction was removed in this state.AB1217,5,20194. A method to access a standardized electronic prior authorization request 20transaction process.AB1217,5,2221(4) Any clinical review criteria on which a prior authorization requirement or 22restriction is based shall satisfy all of the following:AB1217,5,2423(a) The criteria are based on nationally recognized, generally accepted 24standards except where provided by law.AB1217,6,21(b) The criteria are developed in accordance with the current standards of a 2national medical accreditation entity.AB1217,6,43(c) The criteria ensure quality of care and access to needed health care 4services.AB1217,6,55(d) The criteria are evidence-based.AB1217,6,76(e) The criteria are sufficiently flexible to allow deviations from current 7standards when justified.AB1217,6,98(f) The criteria are evaluated and updated when necessary and no less 9frequently than once every year.AB1217,6,1210(5) No health care plan may deny a claim for failure to obtain prior 11authorization if the prior authorization requirement was not in effect on the date 12that the service was provided.AB1217,6,1713(6) A health care plan or contracted utilization review organization may not 14deem supplies or services as incidental or deny a claim for supplies or services if a 15provided health care service associated with the supplies or services receives prior 16authorization or if a provided health care service associated with the supplies or 17services does not require prior authorization.AB1217,7,518(7) If a health care plan intends to impose a new prior authorization 19requirement or restriction or intends to amend a prior authorization requirement 20or restriction, the health care plan shall provide all providers contracted with the 21health care plan advanced written notice of the new or amended requirement or 22restriction no less than 60 days before the new or amended requirement or 23restriction is implemented. The advanced written notice may be provided in an 24electronic format if the provider has agreed in advance to receive the notices 1electronically. No health care plan may implement a new or amended prior 2authorization requirement or restriction unless the health care plan or a contracted 3utilization review organization has updated the information posted on its website 4required under sub. (3) to reflect the new or amended prior authorization 5requirement or restriction.AB1217,86Section 8. 632.848 of the statutes is created to read:AB1217,7,87632.848 Exemption from prior authorization requirements. (1) In this 8section: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1217 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1217 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1217 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1217 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1217: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting